Utah statutes.
4-17-6.   Weed control supervisor -- Qualification -- Appointment -- Duties.

(1) (a)  Each commission may employ one or more weed control supervisors qualified to:

(i)  detect and treat noxious weeds; and

(ii)  direct the weed control program for the county weed board.

(b)  A person may be a weed control supervisor for more than one county weed board.

(c)  Terms and conditions of employment shall be prescribed by the commission. 

(2)  A supervisor, under the direction of the local county weed control board, shall:

(a)  examine all land under the jurisdiction of the county weed control board to determine whether this chapter and the rules adopted by the department have been met;

(b)  compile data on infested areas;

(c)  consult and advise upon matters pertaining to the best and most practical method of noxious weed control and prevention;

(d)  render assistance and direction for the most effective control and prevention;

(e)  investigate violations of this chapter;

(f)  enforce noxious weed controls within the county; and

(g)  perform any other duties required by the county weed control board.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2007 General Session

